dict/de-DE.dic
Abendmahl/hij
Abiturienten/ghij
Abpack/hij
Abschwächungs/hij
Absolutismus/m
Abtreibungs/hij
Adams/hij
Agenten/ghij
Agrar/hij
Aktivisten/ghij
Aktualität/Pm
Alibi/Smij
Ammen/hij
Angestellte/NRm
Angler/NSFmgij
Anleger/NSFmgij
Anregungs/hij
Antiquitäten/hij
Anwender/NSFmgij
Apparateglasbläser/m
Arbeiter/FNSmgij
Arbeitnehmer/FNSmgij
Assistenz/Pmij
Astronauten/ghij
Aufheiz/hij
Aufkauf/STpm
Aufwärts/hij
Ausbilder/NSFmgij
Ausgeh/hij
Ausschnitt/EPSTm
Aussteige/hij
Aussteiger/SNFmgij
Bäcker/FNSmgij
Baracken/hij
Base/Nm
Beamten/ghij
Bedenken/ijm
Begriffs/hij
Bekenner/ghij
Beleihungs/hij
Belfast/Sm
Beobachter/FNSmgij
Berufs/hij
Besucher/FNSmgij
Besuchs/hij
Bevölkern/SJm
Bezugs/hij
Bläser/NFSmgij
Blau/hij
Boccia/m
Boom/Smij
Botschafter/FNSmgij
Brillant/hij
Bürger/FNSmgij
Bürgertum/Sm
Budget/Smij
Choreograph/FPm
Christen/hij
Dauer/Nmij
Defaultwert/EPSm
Depot/Smij
Designer/SNFmgij
Differenzierungs/hij
Diktaphon/ESPm
Diplomaten/ghij
Dolmetscher/FNSmgij
Dom/EPTSmij
Dribbelkünstler/SNFm
Dünn/hij
Ehegatten/ghij
Eigentümerschaft/Pm
Eingriffs/hij
Einsteiger/NSFmgij
Elch/EPSTmij
Elektrolyse/m
Emigranten/ghij
England/Smij
Entnazifizierungs/hij
Entwickler/NSFmgij
Erbauer/NSFm
Erholungs/hij
Erwerbs/hij
Erzeuger/NSFmgij
Ethiker/NSFm
Explosions/hij
Farm/Pm
Fassungs/hij
Filter/NSmij
Fischer/FNSmgij
Flugzeug/hij
Forscher/FNSmgij
Fortgeschrittenenkurs/EPTm
Freiheits/hij
Fürsten/ghij
Fundamental/hij
Gebiets/hij
Geheiß/Tm
Geistes/hij
Geruchs/hij
Gewerbe/SNmij
Glaubwürdigkeit/m
Globalisierungs/hij
Gründer/FNSmgij
Gruß/Tpmij
Händler/FNSmgij
Hals/Tmij
Haufenbildung/Pm
Heimat/ijm
Hirsch/EPSTmij
Hörer/NSFmgij
Hütten/hij
Hundstage/Nm
Individual/hij
Ingenieur/EPSFmgij
Insider/NSFmgij
Internats/hij
Irrenärzte/NFm
Juni/Smij
Juristen/ghij
Kaiser/FNSmgij
Kantinen/hij
Kartoffelschälen/Sm
Keil/SPEmij
Ketzer/FNSmgij
Klang/Spmij
Koitus/m
Kompositions/hij
Kräfte/Nmij
Kreditor/SPFm
Landschafts/hij
Lehrer/FNSmgij
Leinensack/m
Lohn/TSmij
Maloche/m
Medien/ijm
Mieter/NSFmgij
Minimieren/SJm
Mitarbeiter/ghij
Modernisierungs/hij
Nachlässigkeit/Pm
Nazi/Smij
Obhut/m
Optimierungs/hij
Partner/NSFmgij
Patzer/NSm
Personen/hij
Pilger/NSFmgij
Piraten/ghij
Polizeiwachtmeister/m
Praktikanten/ghij
Preis/TEPmij
Putz/ijm
Rand/ETSmij
Reiter/NFSmgij
Reminiszenz/Pm
Reporter/FNSmgij
Ritter/NSFmgij
Same/Nm
Sanitäts/hij
Schlosser/NSFmgij
Schlüssel/NSMmij
Schmorbraten/m
Schüler/FNSmgij
Schweiß/TEmij
Sensibilität/Pm
Sinus/ijm
Soldaten/ghij
Speisennummer/m
Spreng/hij
Stilwandel/m
Straf/hij
Studenten/ghij
Tal/STm
Tank/Smij
Teilnehmer/FNSmgij
Töpfer/NSFmgij
Total/hij
Tour/Pm
Trainer/NFSmgij
Überlassungs/hij
Umlenkkanten/m
Unternehmer/ghij
Urheber/FNSmgij
Ursprungs/hij
Vegetation/Pm
Verbraucher/NSFmgij
Vermessungs/hij
Versinnbildlichung/m
Vertreter/FNSmgij
Volks/hij
Wähler/FNSmgij
Wandern/SJm
Weih/hij
Würfel/NSmij
Zäune/Nm
Zigeuner/FNSmgij
Zubereitungs/hij
Zuschauer/FNSmgij
äquivalents/ozm
abendmahl/hke
abiturienten/ghke
abonnenten/ghke
abpack/hke
abschwächungs/hke
abtreibungs/hke
abverkaufen/DIOXY
adams/hke
agrar/hke
akrobaten/ghke
akupunktieren/DIOXYW
albino/Sozm
alibi/hke
ammen/hke
anfänger/ghke
angehören/DIOXY
angestellten/hke
anleger/ghke
anrechts/hke
antifa/hke
anwender/ghke
aquitanien/ozm
arbeiter/ghke
arbeitnehmer/ghke
armieren/DIOXY
asien/hke
auferwecken/DIOXY
aufgabe/hke
auftriebs/hke
ausbilder/ghke
ausgabe/hke
aussonderungs/hke
aussortieren/BDIOXY
ausspruch/STozm
autoren/hke
bäcker/ghke
bann/hke
beabsichtigen/DIOXY
becher/hke
bedingen/DIOXY
befeuern/DIOXYW
begeistern/DIOXY
begleit/hke
beheizen/BDIOXY
bekenner/ghke
bekleben/DIOXY
belastungs/hke
belegen/BDIOXY
bemustern/DIOXYW
benachrichtigen/SJozm
berauben/DIOXY
bergmanns/hke
besänftigen/DIOXY
beschlagnahmen/DIOXY
besiedeln/DIOXY
bestäuben/DIOXYW
bestechungs/hke
besuchen/DIOXY
besucher/ghke
betrüben/DIOXY
bewahren/DIOXYW
bewerbungs/hke
bezuschussen/BIOXY
birnen/hke
bogen/hke
bolivianer/NSFozm
botschafter/ghke
brech/hke
bündelungs/hke
champignon/hke
choreographieren/DIOXY
chromerz/EPTozm
dampfer/hke
degradieren/DIOXY
delegierten/ghke
demobilisieren/DIOXY
desertieren/DIOXY
designer/ghke
dick/ACke
diffamieren/DIOXY
dilschaltereinstellung/Pozm
disziplinar/hke
dolmetscher/ghke
dominieren/DIOXY
dreier/ke
durchforsten/DIOXY
durchsegeln/DIOXY
dusch/hke
einbehalten/SJozm
einfahrt/hke
eingravieren/DIOXY
einschränkungs/hke
einwohner/ghke
emigranten/ghke
empören/DIOXY
entfachen/DIOXY
enthauptungs/hke
enthüllen/DIOXY
entmachten/DIOXY
entschlüpfen/DIOXY
entweihen/DIOXY
erahnen/DIOXY
erblasser/FNSozm
erdungs/hke
erfolgen/DIOXY
erhärten/DIOXY
erkranken/DIOXY
ermahnen/DIOXY
erquicken/DIOXY
errichtungs/hke
ersehnen/DIOXY
ersuchen/DIOXY
erwecken/DIOXY
erzeuger/ghke
eutrophieren/DIOXY
evaluierungs/hke
fahrer/ghke
fakturieren/IOXY
farngebüsch/SPTozm
fenster/hke
flaschen/hke
flieger/ghke
formulierungs/hke
fortbewegen/DIOXY
fortsatz/Tozm
frontal/Ake
fürsten/ghke
gang/hke
gefährdungs/hke
geheul/STozm
geleiten/DIOXY
gemüts/hke
geschoss/hke
gift/hke
gleichen/SJozm
grafik/hke
gravieren/IOXY
guts/hke
händler/ghke
hang/hke
haufenbildung/Pozm
herkunfts/hke
hobel/hke
hungersnöte/Nozm
hydraulik/hke
implizieren/DIOXY
infrarot/Ake
ingenieur/ghke
institutionalisieren/IOXY
investment/hke
irren/SJozm
juristen/ghke
käufer/ghke
kanzler/ghke
kapitalisieren/BDIOXY
kartieren/SJozm
kern/hke
kodier/hke
kohlrüben/ozm
kompensieren/BDIOXY
konzept/hke
konzipieren/DIOXY
kreativitätsverlust/STozm
kupplungs/hke
leierkasten/ozm
leucht/hke
mäandrieren/DIOXY
malereimer/Nozm
marathon/hke
meister/ghke
minderheiten/hke
minderwertigkeitsgefühl/EPSTozm
mitbetreuen/IXYDO
näh/hke
nachhaltigkeit/ozm
narkotisieren/DIOXY
nudel/hke
nutzer/ghke
oberflächlichkeit/Pozm
parade/hke
parodieren/DIOXY
patient/FPozm
piloten/ghke
platten/hke
polen/SJozm
prädisponieren/DIOXY
pseudo/hke
punkszene/ozm
quantifizieren/BDIOXY
raucher/ghke
reformations/hke
reinvestieren/DIOXY
rekrutieren/SJozm
rezitieren/BDIOXY
richter/ghke
rost/hke
salm/Pozm
schicksals/hke
schmelz/TEozm
schmuggler/ghke
schranken/hke
seminar/EPSozm
semmel/hke
skizzieren/DIOXY
spalt/hke
sparer/ghke
spartensender/SNozm
stech/hke
stiftungsrat/ozm
sünden/hke
subventionieren/DIOXY
tageblatt/Sozm
teilnehmer/ghke
terrorismus/hke
toppsegel/NSozm
trainer/ghke
transferieren/DIOXY
trick/hke
überfordern/DIOXY
überreichen/DIOXY
übervorteilen/DIOXY
umfrage/Nozm
umlagern/DIOXY
umschlag/hke
untergliedern/DIOXY
urheber/ghke
validität/ozm
verabreden/DIOXY
verblassen/DIOXY
verbund/hke
verdingen/DIOXY
vereisen/DIOXY
vergaffen/DIOXY
verheimlichen/DIOXY
verklären/DIOXY
verlachen/DIOXY
vermindern/DIOXY
verpflichten/DIOXY
verrühren/BDIOXYW
verschmachten/DIOXY
verschmitztheit/ozm
versinnbildlichen/DIOXY
verstreuen/DIOXY
verteilungs/hke
vertreter/ghke
vervielfältigen/DIOXY
verwöhnen/DIOXY
vollenden/DIOXY
wach/ACke
waldorfschule/Nozm
weiterverkaufen/BIXYDO
wiederhaken/dhke
wucht/ozm
zelt/hke
zerkochen/DIOXYW
zigeuner/ghke
zitieren/BDIOXY
zwangs/hke
zwinger/NSozm
